Utah statutes.
26-52-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Account" means the Autism Treatment Account created in Section 26-52-201.

(2)  "Autism spectrum disorder" means a pervasive developmental disorder as defined by the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual on Mental Disorders, including:

(a)  Autistic disorder;

(b)  Asperger's disorder; and

(c)  pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified.

(3)  "Committee" means the Autism Treatment Account Advisory Committee created under Section 26-52-202.

(4)  "Early intensive behavior therapy" means therapy that:

(a)  involves intensive behavioral intervention over an extended period of time;

(b)  is evidence-based; and

(c)  is generally accepted by the medical community or the American Academy of Pediatrics as an effective treatment for young children with an autism spectrum disorder.

